data/grammar/fst/endings-generated.lexc
LEXICON OnlyModeDecEndings
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:vunga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:punga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:punga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:punga # ;
++vunga+tv-dec-1s:VOICEqunga # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:vutit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:putit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:putit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:putit # ;
++vutit+tv-dec-2s:VOICEqutit # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:vuq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:puq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:puq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:puq # ;
++vuq+tv-dec-3s:VOICEquq # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:vuguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:puguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:puguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:puguk # ;
++vuguk+tv-dec-1d:VOICEquguk # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:vusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:vutik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:pusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:putik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:pusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:putik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:pusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:VOICEqusik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:putik # ;
++vusik+tv-dec-2d:VOICEqutik # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:vuuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:vuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:VOICEquuk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:puk # ;
++vuuk+tv-dec-3d:VOICEquk # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:vugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:pugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:pugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:pugut # ;
++vugut+tv-dec-1p:VOICEqugut # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:vusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:pusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:pusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:pusi # ;
++vusi+tv-dec-2p:VOICEqusi # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:vut # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:put # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:put # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:put # ;
++vut+tv-dec-3p:VOICEqut # ;
++langa+tv-dec-1s:langa # ;
++langa+tv-dec-1s:SUPPRlanga # ;
++langa+tv-dec-1s:SUPPRlanga # ;
++langa+tv-dec-1s:SUPPRlanga # ;
++latit+tv-dec-2s:latit # ;
++latit+tv-dec-2s:SUPPRlatit # ;
++latit+tv-dec-2s:SUPPRlatit # ;
++latit+tv-dec-2s:SUPPRlatit # ;
++laq+tv-dec-3s:laq # ;
++laq+tv-dec-3s:SUPPRlaq # ;
++laq+tv-dec-3s:SUPPRlaq # ;
++laq+tv-dec-3s:SUPPRlaq # ;
++laguk+tv-dec-1d:laguk # ;
++laguk+tv-dec-1d:SUPPRlaguk # ;
++laguk+tv-dec-1d:SUPPRlaguk # ;
++laguk+tv-dec-1d:SUPPRlaguk # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:lasik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:latik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:SUPPRlasik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:SUPPRlatik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:SUPPRlasik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:SUPPRlatik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:SUPPRlasik # ;
++lasik+tv-dec-2d:SUPPRlatik # ;
++lak+tv-dec-3d:lak # ;
++lak+tv-dec-3d:SUPPRlak # ;
++lak+tv-dec-3d:SUPPRlak # ;
++lak+tv-dec-3d:SUPPRlak # ;
++lagut+tv-dec-1p:lagut # ;
++lagut+tv-dec-1p:SUPPRlagut # ;
++lagut+tv-dec-1p:SUPPRlagut # ;
++lagut+tv-dec-1p:SUPPRlagut # ;
++lasi+tv-dec-2p:lasi # ;
++lasi+tv-dec-2p:SUPPRlasi # ;
++lasi+tv-dec-2p:SUPPRlasi # ;
++lasi+tv-dec-2p:SUPPRlasi # ;
++lat+tv-dec-3p:lat # ;
++lat+tv-dec-3p:SUPPRlat # ;
++lat+tv-dec-3p:SUPPRlat # ;
++lat+tv-dec-3p:SUPPRlat # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:varma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:parma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:parma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:parma # ;
++varma+tv-dec-2s-1s:VOICEqarma # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:vaanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3s-1s:VOICEqaanga # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:vagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:pagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:pagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:pagit # ;
++vagit+tv-dec-1s-2s:VOICEqagit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:vaatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3s-2s:VOICEqaatit # ;
++vara+tv-dec-1s-3s:vara # ;
++vara+tv-dec-1s-3s:para # ;
++vara+tv-dec-1s-3s:para # ;
++vara+tv-dec-1s-3s:para # ;
++vara+tv-dec-1s-3s:VOICEqara # ;
++vait+tv-dec-2s-3s:vait # ;
++vait+tv-dec-2s-3s:pait # ;
++vait+tv-dec-2s-3s:pait # ;
++vait+tv-dec-2s-3s:pait # ;
++vait+tv-dec-2s-3s:VOICEqait # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:vanga # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:vaa # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:panga # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:paa # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:panga # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:paa # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:VOICEqanga # ;
++vanga+tv-dec-3s-3s:VOICEqaa # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:vattiguk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:vattikkuk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:pattiguk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:pattikkuk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:pattiguk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:pattikkuk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:pattiguk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:pattikkuk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:VOICEqattiguk # ;
++vattiguk+tv-dec-2s-1d:VOICEqattikkuk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:vaatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:vaatikkuk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:paatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:paatikkuk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:paatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:paatikkuk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:paatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:paatikkuk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:VOICEqaatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3s-1d:VOICEqaatikkuk # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1s-2d:vassik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1s-2d:passik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1s-2d:passik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1s-2d:passik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1s-2d:VOICEqassik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:vaasik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:vaatik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:paasik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:paatik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:paasik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:paatik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:paasik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:paatik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:VOICEqaasik # ;
++vaasik+tv-dec-3s-2d:VOICEqaatik # ;
++vaakka+tv-dec-1s-3d:vaakka # ;
++vaakka+tv-dec-1s-3d:paakka # ;
++vaakka+tv-dec-1s-3d:paakka # ;
++vaakka+tv-dec-1s-3d:paakka # ;
++vaakka+tv-dec-1s-3d:VOICEqaakka # ;
++vaakkik+tv-dec-2s-3d:vaakkik # ;
++vaakkik+tv-dec-2s-3d:paakkik # ;
++vaakkik+tv-dec-2s-3d:paakkik # ;
++vaakkik+tv-dec-2s-3d:paakkik # ;
++vaakkik+tv-dec-2s-3d:VOICEqaakkik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3s-3d:vaangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3s-3d:paangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3s-3d:paangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3s-3d:paangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3s-3d:VOICEqaangik # ;
++vaptigut+tv-dec-2s-1p:vaptigut # ;
++vaptigut+tv-dec-2s-1p:paptigut # ;
++vaptigut+tv-dec-2s-1p:paptigut # ;
++vaptigut+tv-dec-2s-1p:paptigut # ;
++vaptigut+tv-dec-2s-1p:VOICEqaptigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3s-1p:vaatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3s-1p:paatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3s-1p:paatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3s-1p:paatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3s-1p:VOICEqaatigut # ;
++vatsi+tv-dec-1s-2p:vatsi # ;
++vatsi+tv-dec-1s-2p:patsi # ;
++vatsi+tv-dec-1s-2p:patsi # ;
++vatsi+tv-dec-1s-2p:patsi # ;
++vatsi+tv-dec-1s-2p:VOICEqatsi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3s-2p:vaasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3s-2p:paasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3s-2p:paasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3s-2p:paasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3s-2p:VOICEqaasi # ;
++vakka+tv-dec-1s-3p:vakka # ;
++vakka+tv-dec-1s-3p:pakka # ;
++vakka+tv-dec-1s-3p:pakka # ;
++vakka+tv-dec-1s-3p:pakka # ;
++vakka+tv-dec-1s-3p:VOICEqakka # ;
++vatit+tv-dec-2s-3p:vatit # ;
++vatit+tv-dec-2s-3p:patit # ;
++vatit+tv-dec-2s-3p:patit # ;
++vatit+tv-dec-2s-3p:patit # ;
++vatit+tv-dec-2s-3p:VOICEqatit # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:vangit # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:vait # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:pangit # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:pait # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:pangit # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:pait # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:pangit # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:pait # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:VOICEqangit # ;
++vangit+tv-dec-3s-3p:VOICEqait # ;
++vaattinga+tv-dec-2d-1s:vaattinga # ;
++vaattinga+tv-dec-2d-1s:paattinga # ;
++vaattinga+tv-dec-2d-1s:paattinga # ;
++vaattinga+tv-dec-2d-1s:paattinga # ;
++vaattinga+tv-dec-2d-1s:VOICEqaattinga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3d-1s:vaanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3d-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3d-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3d-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3d-1s:VOICEqaanga # ;
++vattigik+tv-dec-1d-2s:vattigik # ;
++vattigik+tv-dec-1d-2s:pattigik # ;
++vattigik+tv-dec-1d-2s:pattigik # ;
++vattigik+tv-dec-1d-2s:pattigik # ;
++vattigik+tv-dec-1d-2s:VOICEqattigik # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3d-2s:vaatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3d-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3d-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3d-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3d-2s:VOICEqaatit # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3s:vavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3s:pavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3s:pavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3s:pavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3s:VOICEqavuk # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:vasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:vatik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:pasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:patik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:pasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:patik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:pasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:patik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:VOICEqasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3s:VOICEqatik # ;
++vangak+tv-dec-3d-3s:vangak # ;
++vangak+tv-dec-3d-3s:pangak # ;
++vangak+tv-dec-3d-3s:pangak # ;
++vangak+tv-dec-3d-3s:pangak # ;
++vangak+tv-dec-3d-3s:VOICEqangak # ;
++vaattiguk+tv-dec-2d-1d:vaattiguk # ;
++vaattiguk+tv-dec-2d-1d:paattiguk # ;
++vaattiguk+tv-dec-2d-1d:paattiguk # ;
++vaattiguk+tv-dec-2d-1d:paattiguk # ;
++vaattiguk+tv-dec-2d-1d:VOICEqaattiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3d-1d:vaatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3d-1d:paatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3d-1d:paatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3d-1d:paatiguk # ;
++vaatiguk+tv-dec-3d-1d:VOICEqaatiguk # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1d-2d:vassik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1d-2d:passik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1d-2d:passik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1d-2d:passik # ;
++vassik+tv-dec-1d-2d:VOICEqassik # ;
++vaatik+tv-dec-3d-2d:vaatik # ;
++vaatik+tv-dec-3d-2d:paatik # ;
++vaatik+tv-dec-3d-2d:paatik # ;
++vaatik+tv-dec-3d-2d:paatik # ;
++vaatik+tv-dec-3d-2d:VOICEqaatik # ;
++vaavuk+tv-dec-1d-3d:vaavuk # ;
++vaavuk+tv-dec-1d-3d:paavuk # ;
++vaavuk+tv-dec-1d-3d:paavuk # ;
++vaavuk+tv-dec-1d-3d:paavuk # ;
++vaavuk+tv-dec-1d-3d:VOICEqaavuk # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:vaassik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:vaattik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:paassik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:paattik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:paassik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:paattik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:paassik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:paattik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:VOICEqaassik # ;
++vaassik+tv-dec-2d-3d:VOICEqaattik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3d-3d:vaangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3d-3d:paangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3d-3d:paangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3d-3d:paangik # ;
++vaangik+tv-dec-3d-3d:VOICEqaangik # ;
++vaattigut+tv-dec-2d-1p:vaattigut # ;
++vaattigut+tv-dec-2d-1p:paattigut # ;
++vaattigut+tv-dec-2d-1p:paattigut # ;
++vaattigut+tv-dec-2d-1p:paattigut # ;
++vaattigut+tv-dec-2d-1p:VOICEqaattigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3d-1p:vaatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3d-1p:paatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3d-1p:paatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3d-1p:paatigut # ;
++vaatigut+tv-dec-3d-1p:VOICEqaatigut # ;
++vassi+tv-dec-1d-2p:vassi # ;
++vassi+tv-dec-1d-2p:passi # ;
++vassi+tv-dec-1d-2p:passi # ;
++vassi+tv-dec-1d-2p:passi # ;
++vassi+tv-dec-1d-2p:VOICEqassi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3d-2p:vaasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3d-2p:paasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3d-2p:paasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3d-2p:paasi # ;
++vaasi+tv-dec-3d-2p:VOICEqaasi # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3p:vavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3p:pavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3p:pavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3p:pavuk # ;
++vavuk+tv-dec-1d-3p:VOICEqavuk # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:vasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:vatik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:pasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:patik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:pasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:patik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:pasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:patik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:VOICEqasik # ;
++vasik+tv-dec-2d-3p:VOICEqatik # ;
++vangik+tv-dec-3d-3p:vangik # ;
++vangik+tv-dec-3d-3p:pangik # ;
++vangik+tv-dec-3d-3p:pangik # ;
++vangik+tv-dec-3d-3p:pangik # ;
++vangik+tv-dec-3d-3p:VOICEqangik # ;
++vapsinga+tv-dec-2p-1s:vapsinga # ;
++vapsinga+tv-dec-2p-1s:papsinga # ;
++vapsinga+tv-dec-2p-1s:papsinga # ;
++vapsinga+tv-dec-2p-1s:papsinga # ;
++vapsinga+tv-dec-2p-1s:VOICEqapsinga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3p-1s:vaanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3p-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3p-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3p-1s:paanga # ;
++vaanga+tv-dec-3p-1s:VOICEqaanga # ;
++vaptigit+tv-dec-1p-2s:vaptigit # ;
++vaptigit+tv-dec-1p-2s:paptigit # ;
++vaptigit+tv-dec-1p-2s:paptigit # ;
++vaptigit+tv-dec-1p-2s:paptigit # ;
++vaptigit+tv-dec-1p-2s:VOICEqaptigit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3p-2s:vaatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3p-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3p-2s:paatit # ;
++vaatit+tv-dec-3p-2s:paatit # ;
